California statutes. Education Code
 statewide technical assistance center, as established in subdivision (d), shall submit a biannual report to the State Department of Education, the Department of Finance, the State Department of Social Services, and the appropriate legislative fiscal and policy committees by no later than January 20, 2033. This report shall include success strategies in serving newcomer pupils and immigrant families, academic outcomes of the pupils that the grantees served, and services provided using the funds.

(f) The statewide technical assistance center, subject to the approval and oversight of the State Department of Education, may subcontract with qualified nonprofit entities to support implementation of the services described in this section. The statewide technical assistance center may use no more than 10 percent of its allocation for this purpose.

(g) The State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Education, and local educational agencies shall ensure that any data collected or reported pursuant to this section, including any data collected by a community based
 organization, complies with Section 234.7, as well as any other restrictions, prohibitions, or other requirements of state or federal law regarding the confidentiality of pupil and family information.

(h) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Immigrant families” means families with household members
 and immediate relatives of pupils in which one or more of the members or relatives are not United States citizens.

(2) “Local educational agency” means a county office of education, school district, or charter school.

(3) “Newcomer pupil” has the same definition as “immigrant children and youth,” as defined in Section 7011(5) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(i) In accordance with Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the
 United States Code, this section provides services for undocumented persons.

(j) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts
 and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 29.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Administration [54460. - 54465.]

54460.

There is in the Department of Education the office of Director of Compensatory Education. The Director of Compensatory Education shall be appointed by the State Board of Education, upon nomination by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and he shall be subject to state civil service. In performing his duties and responsibilities under this chapter the director shall act as the representative of the Department of Education. The Director of Compensatory Education shall be provided with such facilities and staffing necessary to provide him with such technical and clerical assistance as is required in order for him to carry out his duties under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54461.

The Director of Compensatory Education shall, under the policy direction of the State Board of Education and the administrative direction of the Director of Education, have overall supervision and control of programs of compensatory education provided throughout the state, and shall take action necessary to coordinate all such programs. He shall, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and the provisions of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 and the regulations promulgated thereunder, be responsible for receiving and recommending approval or disapproval to the State Board of Education of local program applications and providing technical and consultative assistance to school districts.

The Director of Compensatory Education shall conduct continuing research and study of the subject of programs of compensatory education, involving not only the examination and evaluation of programs established under the provisions of this chapter but comparable undertakings in other states, to the end of effecting improvement in the administration of the programs for compensatory education established under the provisions of this chapter. He shall serve as a clearinghouse and center of information, and shall issue and disseminate to school districts participating in programs established under this chapter or otherwise affected by problems presented by the presence of disadvantaged minors anywhere, such publications and results of investigations as will tend to foster the establishment of sound programs for compensatory education and to enhance their effectiveness.

He shall collect and provide information concerning sources of federal, state, and local public funds, and private funds, which may be available for compensatory education purposes. It shall be the responsibility of the local officials and agencies of the public school system to take necessary measures to secure all outside financial assistance which may be available.

The State Board of Education, on recommendation of the Director of Compensatory Education, shall determine the eligibility of applicant school districts for grants provided under this chapter. Applications for approval of programs and for grants shall be comprehensive in scope. Applicant districts shall, to the extent practicable, provide programs at all grade levels, but special emphasis is to be given programs provided at the preschool and early elementary grade levels.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54462.

The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter, including rules and regulations which:

(a) Prescribe the procedure by which a district shall identify disadvantaged minors.

(b) Establish minimum standards for programs.

(c) Require the annual submission of such reports by school districts as will permit the evaluation of the programs of compensatory education and the accumulation of data and information which will be useful in developing suggestions, policies, and requirements for improvement of such programs generally.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54463.

The State Board of Education, on the recommendation of the Director of Compensatory Education, shall, for purposes of this chapter, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the State Board of Education implementing the same, have the power to approve, withhold approval of, or disapprove of any program of compensatory education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54464.

The Director of Compensatory Education shall not recommend, and the State Board of Education shall not approve, a project or program in compensatory education without assurance that the teacher in the class in which the project or program is to be conducted and other certificated personnel required to provide services under the project or program hold a regular credential.

The Director of Compensatory Education may waive this requirement where the school district submits evidence which is satisfactory to him that provisionally credentialed teachers have been provided through an established career opportunities program, a teacher corps program, or through a district career development plan designed to provide employment opportunities, concurrent training, and career advancement for capable persons of low-income background who wish to enter the teaching profession.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54465.

For all purposes of this chapter the Director of Compensatory Education may array and assign priorities to the programs of compensatory education maintained by the different school districts on the basis of numbers, concentration or density of disadvantaged pupils in particular areas.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Special Teacher Employment Programs [54480. - 54486.]

54480.

From moneys specially appropriated therefor by the Legislature, grants shall be made to school districts pursuant to this article for projects approved by the Director of Compensatory Education involving a particular school or schools to be expended for the employment and in-service education of teachers in grades kindergarten or 1 through 6, with special emphasis on kindergarten and primary grades, and any needed teacher materials and supplies to the end that the number of pupils in these grades in relation to each full-time equivalent classroom teacher in the particular school will be reduced to a ratio of 25 to 1.

For purposes of this article a full-time equivalent classroom teacher is a person employed in a position requiring certification qualifications and whose duties require him to teach pupils in regular day classes for the full time for which he is employed during the regular schoolday. In computing the total number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers, there shall be included, in addition to the employees defined in the preceding sentence, the full-time equivalent of all fractional time for which employees in positions requiring certification qualifications are required to devote to teaching pupils in regular day classes during the regular schoolday.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54481.

It is the intent and purpose of the Legislature that the money appropriated for the purposes of this article be expended primarily for the employment of teachers to the end that the number of pupils in the designated grades in relation to each full-time equivalent classroom teacher be reduced to and sustained at a ratio of 25 to 1. Emphases shall be placed on kindergarten and primary grades for the purpose of continuing to provide small classes for children with preschool experiences. The Director of Compensatory Education shall consider this intent in approving projects submitted pursuant to this article. In the event an applicant district is unable to employ the number of teachers necessary to effect the purposes of this article, the Director of Compensatory Education, notwithstanding the provisions of Section 54480, is authorized to approve projects that provide for the employment of noncertificated teachers’ aides for grades kindergarten or 1 through 6, inclusive, to the end that the number of pupils in those grades in relation to the number of both classroom teachers and teachers’ aides employed for such grades shall not exceed 20 to 1. All teachers’ aides shall be trained in a specially designed in-service education program. Not more than 25 percent of the total allocated to a school district shall be devoted to the employment of teachers’ aides. The use of any portion of the total allocated shall be approved for the employment of noncertificated teachers’ aides by the Director of Compensatory Education only upon certification of the applicant district, approved by the county superintendent of schools which has jurisdiction over the applicant district, that teachers are unavailable for employment in accordance with the primary legislative intent of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54482.

Noncertificated teachers’ aides employed under this article shall be under the immediate supervision and direction of certificated classroom teachers and shall not be utilized to carry out administrative duties other than those administrative duties which may be assigned by the classroom teacher.

A school district may employ as a teachers’ aide any person determined to be qualified, including pupils in attendance in grades 11 and 12 in high schools, and students in attendance in community colleges and in colleges and universities. The employment may be on a regular full-time, or on a part-time basis. The employment of pupils in attendance in grades 11 through 14, in public high schools and community colleges, shall be arranged so that no reduction in attendance credit and State School Fund apportionments results therefrom. Teachers’ aides shall be compensated by the employing school district at a rate no lower than the federal minimum hourly wage for time in which service was actually performed. A person employed as a teachers’ aide shall be under the direct supervision of a certificated employee of the school district for no less than 75 percent of the time for which he is engaged in the performance of the duties during any day. The employment of college and university students as teachers’ aides may, where appropriate, be undertaken for student teaching credit purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54483.

The Director of Compensatory Education, acting pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the State Board of Education, upon the advice of the Directors of the Departments of Finance, Social Services, Employment Development, and Industrial Relations, shall designate the most concentrated areas of poverty and social tension in the state, taking into consideration such factors, among others, as the high incidence of poverty and low family and per capita incomes, unemployment, juvenile delinquency, persons receiving assistance under the program of aid to families with dependent children, and especially the low level of academic achievement by pupils in the public schools.

The Director of Compensatory Education shall allocate the funds available for programs under Section 54480 proportionately by public school population among the areas designated by him. He shall then approve projects proposed to be undertaken by school districts within such areas at particular schools with the highest concentration of low-income children and with the lowest records of academic achievement. Funds not fully utilized in one designated area may be reallocated to the other designated areas. Upon the request of a school district, the Director of Compensatory Education may authorize funds to be used outside the designated areas to serve children from the designated areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

54484.

Apportionments for purposes of this article shall be made upon order of the Superintendent of Public Instruction and by warrant of the State Controller. Moneys apportioned shall be expended precisely as directed by the Director of Compensatory Education, with not more than five percent (5%) of the total apportionments expended for in-service education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54485.

Apportionments to a school district shall be in the form of grants, no part of which shall be required to be matched by a district as a condition to receiving state aid under this article.

In making allocations pursuant to this article the Director of Compensatory Education shall use an allocation factor equivalent to the average statewide teacher salary per full-time equivalent classroom teacher.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54486.

The Director of Compensatory Education shall require that the class size reduction project undertaken pursuant to this article be coordinated with and be an integral part of the school district’s overall compensatory education plan and evaluation report, and that a significant portion of all funds which may be received by a district for purposes of this chapter shall be devoted to the purposes of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Preschool Followthrough Programs [54520. - 54529.]

54520.

It is the intent and purpose of the Legislature by this article to ensure that the instructional program in the early elementary grades in the public schools will complement preschool programs and reinforce the benefits afforded children who have participated therein, and will be directed to maintaining and raising the levels of educational achievement and potential of such children.

Preschool followthrough programs and projects conducted pursuant to this article shall comprise an essential component of compensatory education, and shall be included among and coordinated with other components of compensatory education programs. Except as otherwise specifically provided by this article, such programs and projects shall be subject to all other provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54521.

From funds which may be appropriated therefor by the Legislature, or from federal funds which may be made available for the purpose, grants may be made to applicant school districts which have established projects or programs pursuant to this article. No matching-fund requirements shall be imposed as a condition upon entitlement to any such grant, unless otherwise required for purposes of establishing eligibility for federal funds. The grants shall be disbursed upon order of the Superintendent of Public Instruction and by warrants of the State Controller. Eligibility for grants and the expenditure thereof by the recipient school district shall be provided for by standards and requirements prescribed in rules and regulations of the State Board of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54522.

In accepting federal funds which may be made available for purposes of this article the people of the State of California agree to accept and comply with all conditions and requirements which may be prescribed in connection therewith by or under the authority of federal law.

The State Board of Education is designated as the state educational agency which shall carry out the purposes and provisions of any federal statute under which federal funds may be provided for purposes of this article. The board shall formulate and submit to the United States Commissioner or other designated federal officer or agency any state plan which may be required for such purposes, and shall have the power to revise and amend the same, as required, and shall have overall control and direction of its administration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54524.

The State Board of Education shall provide for the establishment of pilot preschool followthrough programs and projects in schools maintaining grades kindergarten, 1, 2, and 3 at the elementary level. The programs and projects shall be subject to the provisions of Section 54461.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54525.

Pilot preschool followthrough programs and projects shall serve disadvantaged minors in kindergarten, and grades 1, 2, and 3, who have participated in preschool programs conducted pursuant to this chapter or pursuant to any other law of this state, or pursuant to federal law under which funds are provided for the programs, and shall include, to the extent that funds are available, any one or more of the following elements and components (in addition to others which may be determined to be essential under Section 54523):

(a) Reduction of pupil-teacher ratios. Reduction of such ratios to 20 to 1, or lower, at the kindergarten level, and to 25 to 1 or lower in grades 1, 2, and 3 at the elementary level, shall be the basic standards to which such efforts shall be directed.

(b) Establishment of single-session kindergarten programs, with the individual classroom teacher to be responsible for one, rather than two kindergarten classes.

(c) Utilization of teacher aides and other supporting staff personnel.

(d) In-service professional study involving instruction and orientation of school district personnel, with emphasis on developing a better understanding of the disadvantaged children and their educational needs, and developing particular teaching techniques to meet those needs.

(e) Development of curricula and educational aides to meet the educational needs of disadvantaged children, with emphasis upon improving comprehension of, and facility in, the language, and cultural enrichment, and including the development of new approaches to the teaching of academic subjects which will enhance abstract thinking and sharpen the cognitive skills.

(f) Providing comprehensive health services, including medical and dental examinations, programs in nutrition, psychological counseling and speech therapy.

(g) Experimentation in grouping of children to realize the maximum benefits for children.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

54526.

Pilot preschool followthrough programs and projects shall be established on the basis of a geographical dispersion throughout the state which is most appropriate for purposes of this article, as determined by the State Board of Education. The programs and projects shall serve as demonstration models for other school districts in the state in the coordination of preschool, kindergarten, and elementary grade instructional programs for the benefit of disadvantaged minors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 99.)
-------------------------------------------

54529.

Federal funds which may be provided for purposes of this article shall bear all the costs of the administration of the provisions of this article by the State Board of Education and the Department of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Miscellaneous Programs [54680. - 54804.]



  ARTICLE 4. Dream Resource Center Grant Program [54680. - 54685.1.]

54680.

(a) The Dream Resource Center Grant Program is hereby established with the goal of creating Dream Resource Centers at schoolsites that serve pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(b) The purpose of a Dream Resource Center is to provide pupils, including undocumented pupils, in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, with resources that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Financial aid support.

(2) Social services support.

(3) State-funded immigration legal services.

(4) Academic opportunities.

(5) Parent and family workshops.

(c) For purposes of this article, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(d) In accordance with Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code, this section provides services for undocumented persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 30.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

54681.

(a) The department shall administer the Dream Resource Center Grant Program, which shall be a four-year grant program.

(b) (1) (A) A local educational agency, including those that have already established a Dream Resource Center at one or more schoolsites, may apply for funds for one or more schoolsites within the local educational agency.

(B) A local
 educational agency that can demonstrate that they are already providing resources specified in subdivision (b) of Section 54680 through existing programmatic structures, including, but not limited to, community schools or redesigned high schools, may also apply for funds to establish a Dream Resource Center and expand upon existing services.

(2) An application shall demonstrate the need for a Dream Resource Center at one or more schoolsites within the local educational agency or the need for supplemental funding at one or more schoolsites within the local educational agency that has already established a Dream Resource Center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 121.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

54682.

(a) The department shall perform all of the following functions in the administration of the Dream Resource Center Grant Program:

(1) Review applications and award grants based off of a tiered point system that prioritizes applications for funding as follows:

(A) Local educational agencies that are applying for funds for multiple schoolsites shall be given additional points.

(B) Local educational agencies in underserved areas, including those in rural areas, shall be given additional points to ensure local educational agencies across the state are given fair opportunities for funding.

(C) Local educational agencies that serve a large
 percentage of English learners shall be given additional points.

(D) Local educational agencies that serve a large percentage of pupils who are eligible for free or reduced-price meals, as defined in Section 42238.01, shall be given additional points.

(E) Local educational agencies that serve a large percentage of newcomer pupils, as defined in Section 54450, as determined by the previous five years of newcomer pupil enrollment using data on newcomer pupils currently collected pursuant to federal law, shall be given additional points.

(F) Award no more than 5 percent of the total funding to supplementing the funding of existing Dream Resource Centers.

(2) Identify data to be collected by grant recipients.

(3) Identify how the department will collect data reported by grant recipients.

(b) The department and local educational agencies shall ensure that any data collected or reported pursuant to this program, including any data collected by community-based organizations or institutions of higher education pursuant to Section 54683, complies with Section 234.7, as well as any other restrictions, prohibitions, or other requirements of state or federal law regarding the confidentiality
 of pupil and family information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 31.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

54683.

(a) A grant recipient shall use the grant for either or both of the following purposes:

(1) (A) To create a Dream Resource Center that provides pupils with the resources identified pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 54680.

(B) Schoolsites may choose to have the Dream Resource Center solely supported by the schoolsite or can choose to have the Dream Resource Center be supported through memorandums of understanding between the schoolsite and community-based organizations or institutions of higher education.

(2) To supplement, but not supplant, funding for an existing Dream Resource Center that provides pupils with the resources identified pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 54680.

(b) At the conclusion of the grant term, grant recipients shall provide a final report to the department containing both of the following:

(1) Data collected pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 54682.

(2) Successes, best practices, barriers or constraints, outcomes, and other components specified by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 32.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

54684.

On or before December 30, 2028, again on or before December 30, 2030, and again on or before December 30, 2032, the department shall submit a report to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature detailing the successes, best practices, barriers or constraints, and outcomes of Dream Resource Centers funded with grants pursuant to this article. The report shall include the data collected pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (a) of Section 54682.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 124.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

54685.

This article shall be implemented only upon an appropriation by the Legislature for its purposes in the annual Budget Act or other statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 424, Sec. 1.   (AB 278)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

54685.1.

(a) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of seventy five million dollars ($75,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the department to support the Dream Resource Center Grant Program pursuant to this article. This funding shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2030.

(b) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes
 appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 125.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Partnership Academies [54690. - 54697.]

54690.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the partnership academies program has proven to be a highly effective state-school-private sector partnership, providing combined academic and occupational training to high school pupils who present a high risk of dropping out of school, and motivating those pupils to stay in school and graduate. Partnership academies are functioning in high schools across the state, with occupational education and skills development successfully offered in California’s 15 different industry sectors, including electronics, computer technology, finance, agribusiness, alternative energy, environmental design and construction, graphic arts and printing, international business, and space. Partnership academies have been honored
 with national awards for excellence, and the California partnership academies have been given high accolades in various textbooks and studies addressing career technical education or science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) programs.

(b) The Legislature finds the partnership academies are in the forefront of school efforts to integrate academic and career technical education or STEM, and that they can be effective in providing an integrated learning program and high motivation toward pursuing skilled occupational fields to pupils at risk of dropping out of school and to pupils not motivated by the regular educational curriculum. Further, the Legislature finds the partnership academies can make a very positive contribution towards meeting the needs of the state for a highly skilled and educated workforce in the 21st
 century.

(c) Therefore, the Legislature hereby states its intent to expand the number of partnership academies in this state’s high schools, hereafter to be known as California Partnership Academies; to broaden the availability of these learning experiences to interested pupils who do not meet the criteria of at-promise pupils; and to encourage the establishment of academies whose occupational fields address the needs of developing technologies.

(d) For purposes of this article, “at-promise pupil” means a pupil enrolled in high school who is at risk of dropping out of school, as indicated by at least three of the following criteria:

(1) Past record of irregular attendance. For purposes of this section, “irregular attendance”
 means absence from school 20 percent or more of the school year.

(2) Past record of underachievement in which the pupil is at least one-third of a year behind the coursework for the respective grade level, or as demonstrated by credits achieved.

(3) Past record of low motivation or a disinterest in the regular school program.

(4) Disadvantaged economically.

(5) Scoring below basic or far below basic in mathematics or English language arts on the standardized test administered pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 60640) of Chapter 5 of Part 33.

(6) Maintaining a grade point average of
 2.2 or below, or the equivalent of a C minus.

(e) Up to one-half of the pupils enrolled at a partnership academy may be pupils who do not meet the criteria of at-promise pupils.

(f) The department may expend no more than 5 percent of the funds received to carry out this article on administrative expenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 114, Sec. 1.   (AB 1923)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

54691.

Commencing with the 1993–94 fiscal year, from the funds appropriated for that purpose, the Superintendent shall issue grants to school districts maintaining high schools that meet the specifications of Section 54692, for purposes of planning, establishing, and maintaining academies, as follows:

(a) The Superintendent may issue planning grants for purposes of planning partnership academies. The Superintendent shall ensure that the planning grants are
 equitably distributed among high-wealth and low-wealth school districts in urban, rural, and suburban areas. Each planning grant shall be in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

(b) For the 1993–94 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent may issue grants for the implementation and maintenance of existing academies or academies planned pursuant to subdivision (a). Implementation and maintenance grants shall be calculated in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) Districts operating academies may receive one thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400) per year for each qualified pupil enrolled in an academy during the first year of that academy’s operation, provided that no more than forty-two thousand dollars ($42,000) may be granted to any one academy for the initial year.

(2) Districts operating academies may receive one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) for each qualified pupil enrolled in an academy during the second year of that academy’s operation, provided that no more than seventy-two thousand dollars ($72,000) may be granted to any one academy for the second year.

(3) Districts operating academies may receive nine hundred dollars ($900) for each qualified pupil enrolled in an academy during the third and following years of that academy’s operation, provided that no more than eighty-one thousand dollars ($81,000) may be granted to any one academy for each fiscal year.

(c) For purposes of this section, a qualified pupil is a pupil
 who is enrolled in a partnership academy for the 10th, 11th, or 12th grade, obtains 90 percent of the credits each academic year in courses that are required for graduation, and does any of the following:

(1) Successfully completes a school year during the 10th grade with an attendance record of no less than 80 percent.

(2) Successfully completes a school year during the 11th grade with an attendance record of no less than 80 percent.

(3) Successfully graduates after the 12th grade.

A pupil enrolled in an academy who successfully completes only one semester with regard to enrollment, attendance, and credits within the school year is considered qualified for that semester and the district may receive one-half of the funds specified under subdivision
 (b) for that pupil.

(d) At the end of each school year, school districts that have been approved to operate academies pursuant to this article shall certify the following information to the Superintendent:

(1) The operation of each academy in accordance with this article, including Sections 54692 and 54694.

(2) The number of qualified pupils enrolled during the just completed school year, by grade level, for each academy operated by the district.

(3) The amount of matching funds and the dollar value of in-kind support made available to each academy in accordance with subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 54692.

(e) The Superintendent shall adjust each school district’s grant in accordance
 with the certification made to him or her pursuant to subdivision (d) or in accordance with any discrepancies to the certification that may be revealed by audit. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the Superintendent may advance up to 50 percent of the funds as he or she deems appropriate to districts that are approved to operate, or plan to operate partnership academies.

(f) Funds granted to school districts pursuant to this article may be expended without regard to fiscal year. However, the funds must be expended for the maintenance and operation of academies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 650, Sec. 2.   (SB 1354)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2011, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 650.)
-------------------------------------------

54692.

In order to be eligible to receive funding pursuant to this article, a school district shall provide all of the following:

(a) An amount equal to a 100-percent match of all funds received pursuant to this article in the form of direct and in-kind support provided by the district.

(b) An amount equal to a 100-percent match of all funds received pursuant to this article in the form of direct and in-kind support provided by participating companies or other private sector organizations.

(c) An assurance that state funds provided by the partnership academies program shall be used only for the development, operation, and support of partnership academies.

(d) An assurance that each academy will be established as a “school within a school.” Academy teachers shall work as a team in planning, teaching, and troubleshooting program activities. Classes in the academy program shall be limited to academy pupils as specified in subdivision (e). Each participating school district shall establish an advisory committee consisting of individuals involved in academy operations, including school district and school administrators, lead teachers, and representatives of the private sector.

(e) Assurance that each academy pupil will be provided with the following:

(1) Instruction in at least three academic subjects each regular school term that prepares the pupil for a regular high school diploma, and, where possible and appropriate, to meet the subject requirements for admission to the
 California State University and the University of California. These subjects should contribute to an understanding of the occupational field of the academy.

(2) Career technical education or science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) courses offered at each grade level at the academy that are part of an occupational course sequence that targets comprehensive skills and that does the following:

(A) Provides career technical education or STEM courses in high skill occupations of regional and local economic need.

(B) Focuses on occupations requiring comprehensive skills leading to higher than entry-level wages, or the possibility of significant wage increases after a few years on the job, or both.

(C) Provides a sequence of courses that build
 upon each other in knowledge, skill development, and experience, and ends in a capstone course that includes an internship component.

(D) Prepares pupils for employment and postsecondary education. Sequenced courses shall be linked to certificate and degree programs in the region, where possible.
